Tennessee, session 114, HB1998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4204(e), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(3) Apply to searches of containers, packages, or other enclosures that are not
ordered by a principal, but that are conducted:
(A) Using a stationary metal detector or weapons detection system, or
using a handheld device designed to indicate the presence of dangerous
weapons, drug paraphernalia, or drugs before any student or visitor is permitted
to enter a school building or certain areas on school grounds; or
(B) Pursuant to § 49-6-4207(b).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4207, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following new subsection:
(b)
(1) If a student, visitor, container, package, or other enclosure used for
storage by a student or visitor must pass through a stationary metal detector or
weapons detection system, or be screened using a handheld device designed to
indicate the presence of dangerous weapons, drug paraphernalia, or drugs,
before the student or visitor is permitted to enter a school building or certain
areas on school grounds, and, if during the initial screening the metal detector,
weapons detection system, or handheld device indicates the potential presence
HB1998
012187
- 1 -

of dangerous weapons, drug paraphernalia, or drugs, then a secondary search
may be conducted of the student, visitor, container, package, or enclosure.
(2) Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(3) and (4), a secondary search
conducted of a container, package, or enclosure may be conducted by a:
(A) School resource officer who is acting, for the purpose of the
search, as a school official;
(B) School security officer;
(C) School administrator who has completed training pursuant to
§ 49-6-4212; or
(D) School employee designated by the school principal to
conduct a search pursuant to this subsection (b) who has completed
training pursuant to § 49-6-4212.
(3) A secondary physical search conducted of a student or an enclosure
on the student's person that cannot be removed from the student and searched
independently, such as a pocket on clothing being worn by the student at the
time of the search, must be conducted pursuant to § 49-6-4205.
(4) A secondary physical search conducted of a visitor or an enclosure
on the visitor's person that cannot be removed from the visitor and searched
independently, such as a pocket on clothing being worn by the visitor at the time
of the search, must be conducted by a:
(A) School resource officer who is acting, for the purpose of the
search, as a school official;
(B) School security officer; or
(C) School administrator who has completed training pursuant to
§ 49-6-4212.
- 2 - 012187

(c) This section does not:
(1) Authorize a search that violates the fourth amendment to the United
States Constitution or the Constitution of Tennessee, Article I, § 7; or
(2) Restrict a law enforcement officer from conducting a lawful search on
school property.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-4212(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) A school administrator or school employee designated by a school principal
for purposes of § 49-6-4207(b) must complete the orientation and training program
developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) prior to conducting a search
pursuant to § 49-6-4204(a)(2)(C), § 49-6-4205(a)(2)(C), or § 49-6-4207(b).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 012187